Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1738
Foreign support order entry; effect; amounts credited.

A foreign support order entered pursuant to section 43-1729 shall not nullify and shall not be nullified by a support order made by a court of this state pursuant to any other law or by any other foreign support order. Amounts collected by any income withholding shall be credited against the amounts accruing or accrued for any period under any support order issued by this state which is the subject of an income withholding notice or any other foreign support order which is the subject of an income withholding order pursuant to section 43-1737.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 58.